South Dakota, session 2026, HB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-6-105 be AMENDED:
10-6-105. All real property subject to taxation shall must be listed and assessed
annually, but the value of such the property is to be determined according to its value on
the first day of November preceding the assessment, while the value of any owner-
occupied single-family dwelling and nonagricultural property, as classified in § 10-6-110,
is subject to the value limitations provided in section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. That chapter 10-6 be amended with a NEW SECTION:
Except as otherwise provided in this section, for purposes of the annual assessment
required by § 10-6-105, the assessed value of an owner-occupied single-family dwelling
or nonagricultural property may not increase more than three percent annually.
A property subject to the limitation of this section must be assessed at its fair
market value when:
(1) A change in ownership of the property occurs;
(2) The classification or use of the property changes; or
(3) An addition or expansion has been made to the property.
Subdivision (3) of this section does not include additions to, or expansions of,
existing structures affixed to the land if the improvements result in an increase in the
property's fair market value of forty percent or less. The renovation of existing structures
does not constitute an addition or expansion of the property.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.